Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-123
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-101 to 76-123 may be referred to as the Uniform Property Act.

Laws 1941, c. 153, § 23, p. 599;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-1023;

R.S.1943, § 76-123.